src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON_SGGEN_N

+Sg+Gen:n # ;

LEXICON PRON_SGNOM_0

+Sg+Nom:0 CLITS_KI_OPT ;

LEXICON PRON_PLNOM_0

+Pl+Nom:0 # ;

LEXICON PRON_PLPAR_IE

+Pl+Par:ie # ;

LEXICON PRON_PLGEN_IJEN

+Pl+Gen:ijen # ;

LEXICON PRON_PLGEN_IEN

+Pl+Gen:ien # ;

LEXICON PRON_SGPAR_E

+Sg+Par:e # ;
+Sg+Par+Px3:eh # ;

LEXICON PRON_SGPAR_TA

+Sg+Par:ta # ;

LEXICON PRON_SGPAR_TÄ

+Sg+Par:tä # ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT

0 PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT  ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT_S

0 PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT_S ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_BACK

0 PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_BACK_S

0 PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK_S ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK

+Sg+Ess:na # ;


LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK

+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Sg+Ine:s # ;
+Sg+Ine:šša # ;
+Sg+Ela:šta # ;
+Sg+Ela:sta # ;
+Sg+Ill:h # ;
+Sg+Ade:lla # ;
+Sg+Ade:la # ;
+Sg+All:le # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK_S

+Sg+Abl:lta # ;
+Sg+Ade:lla # ;
+Sg+Ade:la # ;
+Sg+All:le # ;
+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Sg+Ine:s # ;
+Sg+Ine:ssa # ;
+Sg+Ela:sta # ;
+Sg+Ill:h # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT

+Sg+Ess:nä # ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT
+Sg+Abl:ltä # ;
+Sg+Ade:llä # ;
+Sg+Ade+Px3:lläh # ;
+Sg+All:le # ;
+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Sg+Ine:s # ;
+Sg+Ine:ššä # ;
+Sg+Ine:štä # ;
+Sg+Ill:h # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT_S !Perhaps change to no-px

+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Sg+Ine:s # ;
+Sg+Ine:ssä # ;
+Sg+Ine:stä # ;
+Sg+Ill:h # ;
+Sg+Ade:llä # ;
+Sg+All:le # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_PL_BACK

0 PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
0 PRON_CASES_PL_BACK_STRONG ;
LEXICON PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK

+Pl+Par:ita # ;
+Pl+Tra:iksi # ;
+Pl+Ine:issa # ;
+Pl+Ela:ista # ;
+Pl+Ade:ila # ;
+Pl+Ade:illa # ;
+Pl+All:ila # ;
+Pl+Abl:ilta # ;
+Pl+Abe:itta # ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_PL_BACK_STRONG

+Pl+Ill:ih # ;
+Pl+Ess:ina # ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT

0 PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_FRONT ;
0 PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT_STRONG ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_FRONT

+Pl+Gen:ijän # ;
+Pl+Par:itä # ;
+Pl+Tra:iksi # ;
+Pl+Ine:issä # ;
+Pl+Ela:istä # ;
+Pl+Ade:ilä # ;
+Pl+Ade:illä # ;
+Pl+All:ilä # ;
+Pl+Abl:iltä # ;
+Pl+Abe:ittä # ;

LEXICON PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT_STRONG

+Pl+Ess:inä # ;
+Pl+Ill:ih # ;
