src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! # Viena Karelian Pronouns
!  --------
!! The file list pronoun stems .

LEXICON Pronouns
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**


minä+Pron+Use/Dialect+Pers+Sg1:mi PRON_MI/NÄ ;
mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1:mi PRON_MI/E ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2:si PRON_MI/E ;!which one šie vs sie 20250826
sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Use/NG:ši PRON_MI/E ;!Bible
hiän+Pron+Pers+Sg3:h  PRON_H/IÄN ;
mie+Pron+Pers+Pl1:m  PRON_M/YÖ ;
mie+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Pl+Gen:miän # ;
mie+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Pl+Acc:miät # ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Pl2:t  PRON_M/YÖ ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Pl+Gen:tiän # ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Pl+Acc:tiät # ;
hiän+Pron+Pers+Pl3:h PRON_M/YÖ ;
hiän+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Pl+Acc:hiät # ;

tämä+Pron+Dem:tä  PRON_TÄ/MÄ ;
nämä+Pron+Dem:nä  PRON_NÄ/MÄ ;
tuo+Pron+Dem:t  PRON_T/UO ;
nuo+Pron+Dem:n  PRON_N/UO ;
še+Pron+Dem:š  PRON_Š/E ;
ne+Pron+Dem:n  PRON_N/E ;

kenkänä+Pron+Ind+Sg+Nom:kenkänä # ;
kenkänä+Pron+Ind+Sg+Par:ketänä # ;
iče+Pron+Refl:ič   PRON_IČ/E ;
kaikki+Pron+Ind:kai  PRON_KAI/KKI ;
kumpaine+Pron+Interr:kumpa  PRON_KUMPA/INE ;
kumpaine+Pron+Rel:kumpa  PRON_KUMPA/INE ;
kumpaine+Pron+Ind:kumpa  PRON_KUMPA/INE ;
kumpani+Pron+Rel:kumpa  PRON_JOKAHI/NI ;!Bible
jokahini+Pron+Ind:jokahi  PRON_JOKAHI/NI ;
moni+Pron+Ind:mon  PRON_MON/I ;
muu+Pron+Ind:mu  PRON_MU/U ;

kennih+Pron+Ind:ke PRON_JOKA ;
joka+Pron+Ind:joka   PRON_JOKA ;
koko+Pron+Ind:koko  PRON_JOKA ;

kudai+Pron+Interr:ku PRON_KU/DAI ;
ken+Pron+Interr:ke PRON_KE/N ;
mi+Pron+Interr:mi PRON_MI ;
ku+Pron+Interr:ku PRON_KU ;
molompi+Pron:molom PRON_MOLOM/PI ;

toini+Pron:toi PRON_TOI/NI ;

mitänä+Pron+Ind+Sg+Nom:mitänä #  ;

LEXICON PRON_MI/NÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**

0:nä  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nu  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_MI/E
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**

0:e PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
!%<sg%>%<par%>:lma  # ;
+Sg+Par:lma # ;

LEXICON PRON_H/IÄN
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:iän  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:än PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:äne PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;


LEXICON PRON_M/YÖ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:yö PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0:e PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_TÄ/MÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:mä PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:mä PRON_SGGEN_N ;
!%<sg%>%<ill%>:hä  # ;
+Sg+Ill:hä # ;

LEXICON PRON_NÄ/MÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:mä PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0  PRON_PLGEN_IJEN ;

LEXICON PRON_T/UO
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:uo  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:uo  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_N/UO
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:uo  PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0:oi  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_Š/E
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:e  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
!%<sg%>%<gen%>:en # ;
!%<sg%>%<ine%>:iinä # ;
!%<sg%>%<ela%>:iitä # ;
!%<sg%>%<ill%>:iih # ;
!%<sg%>%<ill%>:inne # ;
!%<sg%>%<par%>:itä # ;
+Sg+Gen:en # ;
+Sg+Ine:iinä # ;
+Sg+Ela:iitä # ;
+Sg+Ill:iih # ;
+Sg+Ill:inne # ;
+Sg+Par:itä # ;

LEXICON PRON_N/E
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:e  PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0:i  PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
!%<pl%>%<gen%>:iijen # ;
!%<pl%>%<ill%>:iihi # ;
+Pl+Gen:iijen # ;
+Pl+Ill:iihi # ;

LEXICON PRON_IČ/E
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:e  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:či PRON_SGPAR_E ;


LEXICON PRON_KAI/KKI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0 PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:kki PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ke  PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:k  PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
!%<pl%>%<ins%>:kin # ;
!%<pl%>%<com%>:kkine # ;
+Pl+Com:kkine # ;
+Pl+Com+Px3:kkineh # ;
+Pl+Gen:kkien # ;
+Pl+Gen:kkein # ;!CHECKME 
+Pl+Ill:kkih # ;
+Pl+Ins:kin # ;
+Pl+Par:kkie # ;
+Pl+Par+Px3:kkieh # ;
+Sg+Ill:kkeh # ;

LEXICON PRON_KU/DAI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:dai PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:dua PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_MOLOM/PI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:pi  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:m   PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
0:p   PRON_CASES_PL_BACK_STRONG ;
0:ma  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_JOKAHI/NI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:ni PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0:s  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_PLGEN_IEN ;
0:s  PRON_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON PRON_KUMPA/INE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:ine PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ise PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:is  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;

0:ni PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ne PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0:s  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_PLGEN_IEN ;

LEXICON PRON_KE/N
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:n PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ne PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;

LEXICON PRON_MI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT_S ;

LEXICON PRON_KU
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0 PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_JOKA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;

LEXICON PRON_MON/I
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:i PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;


LEXICON PRON_MU/U
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:u PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u PRON_CASES_SG_BACK_S ;
0:u  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_TOI/NI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
0:ni PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0:s PRON_PLPAR_IE ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
